Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  Section 64, chapter  865, Oregon Laws 2009, as amended by section 3, chapter 55,
Oregon Laws 2012, section 1, chapter 11, Oregon Laws 2013,  section 1, chapter 344, Oregon Laws
2015, and section 1, chapter 38, Oregon Laws 2016, is amended to read:
Sec. 64.  (1) Except as provided in subsection (3)(e)(A)  of this section,  proceeds of the bonds,
as defined in  ORS 367.010, authorized under ORS 367.620 (3)(c) may be used to finance all or any
portion of the projects as listed in  subsection (2) of this section. The Oregon Transportation Com-
mission shall determine the order of completion for the  projects listed in subsection (2) of this sec-
tion.
(2) The following amounts are allocated for the projects listed below:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a) U.S. Highway 26 at the
Glencoe Road Interchange ...... $ 21 million
(b) Interstate 84 at the
257th Avenue Interchange ....... $ 27,669,288
(c) State Highway 212: Sunrise
Corridor, Phase I, Units 1,
2 and 3 ......................................... $ 100 million
(d) U.S. Highway 26 at the Shute
Road Interchange, Phase I ...... $ 53,947,687
(e) Interstate 5 at the Interstate
205 Interchange .......................... $  7,330,712
(f) U.S. Highway 26: Cornelius
Pass Road to Cornell Road ..... $ 22,052,313
(g) Interstate 205 and State
Highway 213 at the Washington
Street Interchange ..................... $ 22 million
(h) Interstate 84 at the Hood
River Interchange ...................... $ 10 million
Enrolled Senate Bill 38 (SB 38-INTRO) Page 1
(i) State Highway 43 at the
Sellwood Bridge Interchange .. $ 30 million
(j) State Highway 6 at U.S.
Highway 101 ............................... $ 27 million
(k) State Highway 99W: Newberg
and Dundee Bypass, Phase I ... $ 192 million
(L) Interstate 5 at the State
Highway 214 Interchange ........ $ 49.5 million
(m) Interstate 5 at Beltline
Highway, Units 3, 4, 5,
6 and 7 ......................................... $ 64 million
(n) Beltline Highway at
Delta Highway ........................... $ 8 million
(o) Interstate 5 at Kuebler
Road, Phase I ............................. $ 18.5 million
(p) Interstate 5 at Kuebler
Road, Phase II (Mill Creek) .... $ 4 million
(q) State Highway 42, county
line curves ................................... $ 10 million
(r) State Highway 62: Corridor
Solution, Phase II ...................... $ 100 million
(s) Interstate 5 at the Fern
Valley Road Interchange ......... $ 25 million
(t) Interstate 5 Sutherlin
truck climbing lanes ................. $ 4.1 million
(u) Interstate 5 Sexton truck
climbing lanes ............................. $ 10 million
(v) Interstate 84 at the U.S.
Highway 97 Interchange .......... $ 19 million
(w) U.S. Highway 97: Crooked
River Bridge to Redmond ........ $ 2 million
(x) State Highway 140:
Klamath Falls to the Nevada
state line ...................................... $ 23 million
(y) Murphy Road at the U.S.
Highway 97 Interchange .......... $ 25 million
(z) U.S. Highway 97: Redmond
reroute, Phase II ........................ $ 5 million
(aa) Chico Road reconstruction
in Baker County ........................ $ 621,083
(bb) Chandler Lane reconstruction
in Baker County ........................ $ 2,427,758
(cc) Interstate 84 Spring Creek
climbing lane in
Union County ............................. $ 5.7 million
(dd) Northwest Washington Avenue
in Malheur County .................... $ 4.5 million
(ee) Pierce Road improvements
in Union County ........................ $ 5 million
(ff) State Highway 82 alternate
route in Wallowa County ........ $ 5 million
(gg) Westland Road in Umatilla
Enrolled Senate Bill 38 (SB 38-INTRO) Page 2
County .......................................... $ 1.1 million
(hh) State  Highway 207 and State
Highway 206 intersections ...... $ 0.5 million
(ii) Vehicle chain-up areas east
of Pendleton on Interstate
84................................................... $ 4.7 million
(jj) Izee-Paulina Highway in
Grant County .............................. $ 4.5 million
(kk) Monroe  Street and U.S.
Highway 20 Intersection
in Harney County ...................... $ 0.9 million
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(3)(a) When the commission determines that the project described  in subsection (2)(a) of this
section is completed, the commission  shall reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation
made under subsection  (2)(a) of this section to the project described in subsection (2)(d) of this sec-
tion.
(b) When the commission determines that the project described in subsection (2)(d) of  this sec-
tion is  completed, the commission shall reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation made
under subsection (2)(d) of this section to the project described in subsection (2)(f) of this section.
(c) When the commission determines that  the project described in subsection (2)(m) of this sec-
tion is  completed, the commission shall reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation made
under subsection (2)(m) of this section to the project described in subsection (2)(n) of this section.
(d) When the  commission determines that the project described in subsection (2)(L) of this sec-
tion is  completed, the commission shall reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation made
under subsection (2)(L) of this section to the project described in subsection (2)(j) of this section.
(e) Except as provided in paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, when the  commission
determines that a transportation project listed in subsection (2) of this section  is complete,
the commission shall reallocate any amount remaining from the allocation for the  completed
transportation project:
(A) To transportation projects selected by the commission that  are not listed in sub-
section (2) of this section and that leverage federal grant funds; or
(B) To transportation  projects listed in subsection (2) of this section that are located
within the same region as  the completed transportation project. For purposes of this sub-
paragraph, the regions are as follows:
(i) Region one consists of Clackamas, Hood River, Multnomah and Washington  Counties.
(ii) Region two consists of Benton, Clatsop, Columbia,  Lane, Lincoln, Linn, Marion, Polk,
Tillamook and Yamhill Counties.
(iii) Region three consists of Coos, Curry, Douglas, Jackson and Josephine Counties.
(iv) Region four consists of Crook, Deschutes, Gilliam, Jefferson, Klamath, Lake,
Sherman, Wasco and Wheeler Counties.
(v) Region five consists of Baker, Grant, Harney, Malheur, Morrow, Umatilla, Union and
Wallowa Counties.
(4) Prior to June 1, 2010, in addition to the projects listed in subsection (2) of this section, if
projects are recommended to the Oregon Transportation Commission  by the applicable local area
commission on transportation after consultation  with the local governments listed in this subsection,
the Oregon Transportation Commission may also approve and allocate funds to the following  local
governments for projects approved by the commission in the following amounts:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(a) Baker County ................... $ 7,051,159
(b) Grant County .................... $ 1.1 million
Enrolled Senate Bill 38 (SB 38-INTRO) Page 3
(c) Harney County ................. $ 4.1 million
(d) Malheur County ............... $ 5.8 million
(e) Union County ................... $ 1.3 million
(f) Umatilla County............... $ 2.5 million
(g) City of Nyssa .................... $ 1 million
(h) City of Heppner ............... $ 3 million
(i) City of Milton-Freewater $ 3 million
(j) City of Ontario ................. $ 1.2 million
(k) Port of Umatilla ............... $ 4.5 million
(L) Port of Morrow ................ $ 10.7 million
_______________________________________________________________________________________
SECTION 2.  ORS 367.620 is amended to read:
367.620. (1) The principal amount of Highway User Tax  Bonds issued under ORS 367.615 shall
be subject to the provisions of ORS 286A.035.
(2) Highway User Tax Bonds may be issued under  ORS 367.615 for the purposes described in
ORS 367.622 in an aggregate principal amount sufficient to produce net proceeds of  not more than
$500 million.
(3)(a) Highway User Tax Bonds may be issued under ORS 367.615  for bridge purposes described
in section 10 (1), chapter 618, Oregon Laws 2003,  in an aggregate principal amount sufficient to
produce net proceeds of not more than $1.6 billion.
(b) Highway User Tax Bonds may be issued under ORS 367.615 for modernization purposes de-
scribed in sections 10 (2) and 11, chapter 618, Oregon Laws 2003, in an aggregate principal amount
sufficient to produce net proceeds of not more than $300 million.
(c) Highway User Tax Bonds may be issued under ORS 367.615  for the purposes described  in
section 64, chapter 865, Oregon Laws 2009, in an aggregate principal amount sufficient to produce
net proceeds of not  more than $840 million. The proceeds from bonds issued as described in this
paragraph that are not required for the  purposes described in section 64, chapter 865, Oregon Laws
2009, shall be allocated to transportation  projects, as defined in ORS 367.010[ , that are approved by
the Legislative Assembly by law ].
(d) The Department of Transportation, with the approval of the State Treasurer,  may designate
the extent to which  a series of bonds authorized under this subsection is secured and payable on a
parity of lien or on a subordinate basis to existing or future Highway User Tax Bonds.
SECTION 3.
This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Enrolled Senate Bill 38 (SB 38-INTRO) Page 4
Passed by Senate February 21, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House May 23, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 38 (SB 38-INTRO) Page 5